Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-553
City treasurer; duties.

The city treasurer of a city of the metropolitan class shall be a member of the finance department of such city and shall give bond or evidence of equivalent insurance in an amount as required by the finance director of such city. The treasurer shall be liable for the safekeeping and proper disbursement of all funds and money of the city collected or received by him or her. He or she shall keep his or her books and accounts in such manner as to show the amount of money collected by him or her from all sources, the condition of each fund into which the same has been placed, and the items of disbursement thereof.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 41, p. 489;

C.S.1922, § 3667;

C.S.1929, § 14-544;

R.S.1943, § 14-553;

Laws 2007, LB206, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB347, § 3.